Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2207
Administrator; bond or insurance.

Before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his or her office, the administrator shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. The premium shall be paid by the state.

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 7.